Maryland, session 2026, HB1299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
SUBTITLE 10. APPRAISAL COMMUNICATION AND REVIEW PROCESS.
14–1001.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1299*

HOUSE BILL 1299
(B) “APPRAISER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL LICENSED OR CERTIFIED TO
PROVIDE REAL ESTATE APPRAISAL SERVICES UNDER TITLE 16 OF THE BUSINESS
OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS ARTICLE.
(C) “INTERESTED PARTY” INCLUDES A BUYER, A SELLER, A LICENSED REAL
ESTATE AGENT OF A BUYER OR SELLER, OR THE PROPERTY OWNER.
(D) “POINT OF CONTACT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL DESIGNATED BY A
REQUESTOR TO RECEIVE COMMUNICATIONS FROM THE APPRAISER REGARDING
VALUATION ISSUES RELATED TO THE PURCHASE OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY.
(E) “REQUESTOR” MEANS THE LENDER, MORTGAGE BROKER, OR OTHER
INTERESTED PARTY WHO REQUESTS AN APPRAISAL OF RESIDENTIAL REAL
PROPERTY.
14–1002.
(A) AN APPRAISER SHALL NOTIFY THE POINT OF CONTACT AND
INTERESTED PARTIES BEFORE COMPLETING AN APPRAISAL OF RESIDENTIAL REAL
PROPERTY IF THE APPRAISER MAKES A PRELIMINARY DETERMINATION THAT THE
APPRAISED VALUE OF THE PROPERTY MAY BE LESS THAN:
(1) THE CONTRACT PRICE; OR
(2) FOR A REFINANCE, THE ESTIMATED VALUE.
(B) (1) ON RECEIPT OF A NOTICE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, A REQUESTOR OR OTHER INTERESTED PARTY MAY SUBMIT ADDITIONAL
MARKET DATA OR COMPARABLE SALES DATA TO THE APPRAISER FOR THE PURPOSE
OF SUPPORTING THE CONTRACT PRICE OR ESTIMATED VALUE OF THE RESIDENTIAL
REAL PROPERTY.
(2) THE ADDITIONAL DATA SUBMITTED TO AN APPRAISER UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE:
(I) IN A FORMAT SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO THE
COMPARABLE SALES GRID USED IN A UNIFORM RESIDENTIAL APPRAISAL REPORT;
AND
(II) SUBMITTED WITHIN 2 DAYS AFTER THE DATE THE NOTICE
WAS RECEIVED.

HOUSE BILL 1299 3
(C) (1) THE ADDITIONAL MARKET DATA OR COMPARABLE SALES DATA
SUBMITTED BY THE REQUESTOR OR OTHER INTERESTED PARTY UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY SALES
THAT HAVE BEEN VERIFIED AS CLOSED.
(2) IF THE ADDITIONAL MARKET DATA OR COMPARABLE SALES DATA
SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ARE PENDING SALES, THE
SUBMISSION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) ALL CONTRACT DOCUMENTATION; AND
(II) A BRIEF NARRATIVE EXPLAINING THE SIMILARITIES OR
DIFFERENCES BETWEEN THE PENDING RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY SALES, AND
THE RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY THAT IS IN THE CONTRACT.
14–1003.
(A) AN APPRAISER SHALL CONSIDER ANY TIMELY SUBMITTED
INFORMATION BEFORE FINALIZING AN APPRAISAL.
(B) A FINAL APPRAISAL REPORT SHALL INCLUDE AN ADDENDUM TITLED
“APPRAISAL COMMUNICATION ADDENDUM” THAT INCLUDES:
(1) THE DATE THE NOTIFICATION UNDER § 14–1002 OF THIS
SUBTITLE WAS PROVIDED TO THE POINT OF CONTACT;
(2) THE OTHER INTERESTED PARTIES TO WHICH NOTIFICATION WAS
SENT, IF ANY;
(3) A SUMMARY OF THE INFORMATION RECEIVED FROM THE
REQUESTOR OR OTHER INTERESTED PARTY REGARDING THE MARKET DATA OR
COMPARABLE SALES DATA; AND
(4) THE IMPACT, IF ANY, THE ADDITIONAL INFORMATION HAD ON THE
APPRAISER’S DETERMINATION OF THE ESTIMATED VALUE OF THE RESIDENTIAL
REAL PROPERTY.
(C) IF THE ADDITIONAL INFORMATION SUBMITTED TO THE APPRAISER DID
NOT RESULT IN A CHANGE IN THE APPRAISED VALUE, THE APPRAISER SHALL
INCLUDE IN THE ADDENDUM REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION A
BRIEF EXPLANATION DESCRIBING WHY THE INFORMATION DID NOT ALTER THE
ESTIMATED VALUE OF THE RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY.

HOUSE BILL 1299
14–1004.
(A) LENDERS AND APPRAISAL MANAGEMENT COMPANIES SHALL MONITOR
APPRAISALS OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY FOR COMPLIANCE WITH THE
COMMUNICATION PROCESS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE COMMISSIONER OF FINANCIAL REGULATION MAY ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING STANDARDS FOR
DOCUMENTATION, NOTIFICATION, AND DEADLINES.
14–1005.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT USE THE COMMUNICATION AND REVIEW PROCESS
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE TO PRESSURE, INFLUENCE, OR COERCE AN
APPRAISER IN THE DEVELOPMENT, DETERMINATION, OR REPORTING OF AN
APPRAISAL FOR RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY.
(B) A PERSON’S PARTICIPATION IN THE COMMUNICATION AND REVIEW
PROCESS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT ALONE CONSTITUTE AN
ACT OF PRESSURE, INFLUENCE, OR CORROSION UNDER STATE OR FEDERAL LAW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.